Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5353YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2025 Section 1. Section 8A.707, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Maintain adequately staffed research centers that are 3 open to the public in buildings located in Des Moines and Iowa 4 City. 5